Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5356.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 Sec. 9b. "Courtesy transportation vehicle" means a new motor vehicle that has been titled and registered by a dealer and is used primarily for the dealer's service customers. After the courtesy transportation vehicle is used more than 5,000 miles, the vehicle is a used vehicle. Sec. 14. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4), "established place of business" means premises actually occupied either continuously or at regular periods by a dealer or manufacturer at which the dealer or manufacturer keeps its books and records and at which the dealer or manufacturer transacts a large share of its business. (2) For a class (a) or class (b) dealer, "established place of business" means premises that meet all of the following requirements: (a) The premises contain, except as otherwise provided in this act, a permanently enclosed building or structure that is either owned, leased, or rented by the dealer; the building or structure is not a residence, tent, temporary stand, or any temporary quarters; the building or structure is continuously occupied in good faith for the purpose of selling, buying, trading, leasing, or otherwise dealing in motor vehicles; all books, records, and files necessary to conduct the business of a class (a) or class (b) dealer are securely maintained in the building or structure; and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the building or structure houses an office of at least 150 square feet in size, equipped with standard office furniture, secure document storage, working utilities, a working restroom, and a working telephone listed in the name of the business on the dealer's license. (b) The premises have land space of not less than 1,300 square feet to accommodate the display of a minimum of 10 vehicles of the kind and type that the dealer is licensed to sell and an additional 650 square feet for customer parking. (c) The display and customer parking areas described in subdivision (b) are adequately surfaced and well-lit during business hours. (d) The premises are identified by an exterior sign displaying the name of the dealership that is permanently affixed to the building or land with letters clearly visible from the roadway. (e) The premises contain a conspicuous posting of the dealer's regular hours of operation. The posted hours must not be less than 30 hours per week for not less than 48 weeks per year. Fifteen of the 30 hours per week must be between the hours of 8 a.m. and 5 p.m., Monday through Friday. The dealer may change its posted hours of operation to be less than 30 hours per week for not more than 4 weeks per year if the dealer notifies the department not less than 7 days prior to the change. The department shall waive the 7-day notification requirement under this subdivision for good cause, including, but not limited to, a medical emergency or other extenuating circumstances. (f) The premises contain a registered repair facility on site for the repair and servicing of motor vehicles of a type sold at the established place of business, unless the dealer has entered 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 into a written servicing agreement with a registered repair facility at a location that is located within a 10-mile radius of the established place of business. If repairs are conducted under a servicing agreement, the dealer shall conspicuously post the servicing agreement in the dealer's office. (g) The premises meet all applicable zoning requirements and any other applicable municipal requirements. (3) For a wholesaler, "established place of business" means premises that meet all of the following requirements: (a) The premises contain a permanently enclosed building or structure that is either owned, leased, or rented and is not a commercial mailbox, tent, temporary stand, or other temporary quarters. Beginning January 1, 2024, the permanently enclosed building or structure must be heated and electrified. (b) Until December 31, 2023, all books, records, and files necessary to conduct the business of the wholesaler are maintained in the building or structure described in subdivision (a). Beginning January 1, 2024, all books, records, and files necessary to conduct the business of the wholesaler are maintained in an office that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is not less than 8 feet by 8 feet with a door. (ii) Has no fewer than 4 rigid walls. (iii) Has working utilities including, but not limited to, lighting and telephone that are listed in the name of the business on the wholesaler's license. (iv) Has a working restroom. (v) Has standard office furniture including, but not limited to, a desk and a locking filing cabinet. (c) The premises are not used for the display of vehicles. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 However, the premises may be used for the storage of vehicles purchased by the wholesaler before sale to a licensed vehicle dealer. (d) The premises are identified by an exterior sign displaying the name of the wholesaler that is permanently affixed to the building or land with letters clearly visible from the roadway. (e) The premises meet all applicable zoning requirements and any other applicable municipal requirements. (f) The premises contain a conspicuous posting of the wholesaler's regular hours of operation that include at least 15 regular business hours each week between the hours of 8 a.m. and 5 p.m., Monday through Friday. (g) If a wholesaler receives its initial license on or after January 1, 2023, the premises are not located within 200 feet of an established place of business for another licensed wholesaler. (4) For a used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, vehicle scrap metal processor, vehicle salvage pool operator, distressed vehicle transporter, broker, and automotive recycler, "established place of business" means premises that meet all of the following requirements: (a) Beginning January 1, 2024, the premises contain a permanently enclosed building or structure that is heated and electrified and that is either owned, leased, or rented by the business and that is not a commercial mailbox, tent, temporary stand, or other temporary quarters. (b) Beginning January 1, 2024, all books, records, and files necessary to conduct the business of the dealer, processor, operator, transporter, broker, or recycler are maintained in an office that meets all of the following requirements: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (i) Is not less than 8 feet by 8 feet with a door. (ii) Has no fewer than 4 rigid walls. (iii) Has working utilities including, but not limited to, lighting and telephone that are listed in the name of the business on the dealer's, processor's, operator's, transporter's, broker's, or recycler's license. (iv) Has a working restroom. (v) Has standard office furniture including, but not limited to, a desk and a locking filing cabinet. (c) The premises are identified by an exterior sign displaying the name of the dealer, processor, operator, transporter, broker, or recycler that is permanently affixed to the building or land with letters clearly visible from the roadway. (d) The premises meet all applicable zoning requirements and any other applicable municipal requirements. (e) The premises contain a conspicuous posting of the business's regular hours of operation. The posted hours must not be less than 15 hours per week for not less than 48 weeks per year. Five of the 15 hours per week must be between the hours of 8 a.m. and 5 p.m., Monday through Friday. Sec. 41a. "Police book" means a hardcover, bound volume or a an electronic record in a form prescribed by the secretary of state that provides a bought and sold record for each vehicle handled by a dealer, contains the information required by section 251, and includes any other information required by law or the secretary of state. Sec. 78. "Used or second-hand secondhand vehicle" means any motor vehicle, except for a courtesy transportation vehicle, to which a certificate of title and license plates have been issued 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and which motor vehicle has been registered for use on the highways by a consumer or by a dealer. Sec. 217. (1) An owner of a vehicle that is subject to registration under this act shall apply to the secretary of state, on an appropriate form furnished by the secretary of state, for the registration of the vehicle and issuance of a certificate of title for the vehicle. A vehicle brought into this state from another state or jurisdiction that has a rebuilt, salvage, scrap, flood, or comparable certificate of title issued by that other state or jurisdiction must be issued a rebuilt, salvage, scrap, or flood certificate of title by the secretary of state. The application must be accompanied by the required fee. An application for a certificate of title must bear the signature or verification and certification of the owner. The application must contain all of the following: (a) The owner's name, the owner's bona fide residence, and either of the following: (i) If the owner is an individual, the owner's mailing address. (ii) If the owner is a firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the owner's business address. (b) A description of the vehicle including the make or name, style of body, and model year; the number of miles, not including the tenths of a mile, registered on the vehicle's odometer at the time of transfer; whether the vehicle is a flood vehicle or another state previously issued the vehicle a flood certificate of title; whether the vehicle is to be or has been used as a taxi or police vehicle, or by a political subdivision of this state, unless the vehicle is owned by a dealer and loaned or leased to a political subdivision of this state for use as a driver education vehicle; 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 whether the vehicle has previously been issued a salvage or rebuilt certificate of title from this state or a comparable certificate of title from any other state or jurisdiction; the vehicle identification number; and the vehicle's weight fully equipped, if a passenger vehicle registered in accordance with section 801(1)(a), and, if a trailer coach or pickup camper, in addition to the weight, the manufacturer's serial number, or in the absence of the serial number, a number assigned by the secretary of state. A number assigned by the secretary of state must be permanently placed on the trailer coach or pickup camper in the manner and place designated by the secretary of state. (c) A statement of the applicant's title and the names and addresses of the holders of security interests in the vehicle and in an accessory to the vehicle, in the order of their priority. (d) Further information that the secretary of state reasonably requires to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration and the owner entitled to a certificate of title. If the secretary of state is not satisfied as to the ownership of a vehicle having a value over $2,500.00, or $5,000.00 for a new vehicle dealer licensed under this act, or that is less than 10 years old, before registering the vehicle and issuing a certificate of title, the secretary of state may require the applicant to file a properly executed surety bond in a form prescribed by the secretary of state and executed by the applicant and a company authorized to conduct a surety business in this state. The bond must be in an amount equal to twice 2 times the value of the vehicle as determined by the secretary of state and must be conditioned to indemnify or reimburse the secretary of state, any prior owner, and any subsequent purchaser or lessee of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the vehicle and their successors in interest against any expense, loss, or damage, including reasonable attorney fees, because of the issuance of a certificate of title for the vehicle or on account of any defect in the right, title, or interest of the applicant in the vehicle. An interested person has a right of action to recover on the bond for a breach of the conditions of the bond, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons must not exceed the amount of the bond. If the secretary of state is not satisfied as to the ownership of a vehicle that is valued at $2,500.00, or $5,000.00 for a new vehicle dealer licensed under this act, or less and that is 10 years old or older, the secretary of state shall require the applicant to certify that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle and entitled to register and title the vehicle. (e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), an application for a commercial vehicle must also have attached a scale weight receipt of the motor vehicle fully equipped as of the time the application is made. A scale weight receipt is not necessary if there is presented with the application a registration receipt of the previous year that shows on its face the empty weight of the motor vehicle as registered with the secretary of state that is accompanied by a statement of the applicant that there has not been structural change in the motor vehicle that has increased the empty weight and that the previous registered weight is the true weight. (f) An application for registration of a vehicle on the basis of elected gross weight must include a declaration by the applicant specifying the elected gross weight for which application is being made. (g) If the application is for a certificate of title of a motor vehicle registered in accordance with section 801(1)(p), the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 application must include the manufacturer's suggested base list price for the model year of the vehicle. The base list price must be the manufacturer's suggested retail price as shown on the label required to be affixed to the vehicle under 15 USC 1232. If the manufacturer's suggested retail price is unavailable, the application must list the purchase price of the vehicle. As used in this subdivision, "purchase price" means that term as defined in section 801. (2) An applicant for registration of a leased pickup truck or passenger vehicle that is subject to registration under this act, except a vehicle that is subject to a registration fee under section 801g, shall disclose in writing to the secretary of state the lessee's name, the lessee's bona fide residence, and either of the following: (a) If the lessee is an individual, the lessee's Michigan driver license number or Michigan personal identification number or, if the lessee does not have a Michigan driver license or Michigan personal identification number, the lessee's mailing address. (b) If the lessee is a firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the lessee's business address. (3) The secretary of state shall maintain the information described in subsection (2) on the secretary of state's computer records. (4) Except as provided in subsections (5), (11), and (12), a dealer selling, leasing, or exchanging vehicles required to be titled, within 21 days after delivering a vehicle to the purchaser or lessee, and a person engaged in the sale of vessels required to be numbered by part 801 of the natural resources and environmental 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80101 to 324.80199, within 21 days after delivering a boat trailer weighing less than 2,500 pounds to the purchaser or lessee, shall apply to the secretary of state for a new title, if required, and transfer or secure registration plates and secure a certificate of registration for the vehicle or boat trailer, in the name of the purchaser or lessee. Subject to subsection (11), the dealer's license may be suspended or revoked in accordance with section 249 for failure to apply for a title when required or for failure to transfer or secure registration plates and certificate of registration within the 21 days required by this section. Subject to subsection (11), if the dealer or person fails to apply for a title when required, and to transfer or secure registration plates and secure a certificate of registration and pay the required fees within 21 days of delivery of the vehicle or boat trailer, a title and registration for the vehicle or boat trailer may subsequently be acquired only on the payment of a late transfer fee of $50.00 for an individual or a dealer other than a dealer subject to section 235b in addition to the fees specified in section 806. Subject to subsection (11), for a used or secondhand vehicle dealer subject to section 235b, the late transfer fee is $100.00 in addition to the fees specified in section 806. The purchaser or lessee of the vehicle or the purchaser of the boat trailer shall sign the application, including, if applicable, the declaration specifying the maximum elected gross weight as required by subsection (1)(f), and other necessary papers to enable the dealer or person to secure the title, registration plates, and transfers from the secretary of state. If the secretary of state mails or delivers a purchaser's certificate of title to a dealer, the dealer shall mail or deliver 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the certificate of title to the purchaser not later than 5 days after receiving the certificate of title from the secretary of state. However, as provided under section 238, the secretary of state is not required to issue a paper title to the owner of a vehicle or lienholder if the title is subject to a security interest, and may issue an electronic title as provided under section 222. (5) Except as provided in subsection (12), a dealer selling or exchanging an off lease or buy back vehicle shall apply to the secretary of state for a new title for the vehicle within not later than 21 days after it receives the certificate of title from the lessor or manufacturer under section 235 or section 235b and transfer or secure registration plates and secure a certificate of registration for the vehicle in the name of the purchaser. Subject to subsection (12), the dealer's license may be suspended or revoked in accordance with section 249 for failure to apply for a title when required or for failure to transfer or secure registration plates and certificate of registration within the 21-day period. Subject to subsection (12), if the dealer or person fails to apply for a title when required, and to transfer or secure registration plates and secure a certificate of registration and pay the required fees within the 21-day time period, a title and registration for the vehicle may subsequently be acquired only on the payment of a late transfer fee of $50.00 for an individual or dealer other than a used or secondhand vehicle dealer subject to section 235b in addition to the fees specified in section 806. Subject to subsection (12), the late transfer fee for a used or secondhand vehicle dealer subject to section 235b is $100.00 in addition to the fees specified in section 806. The purchaser of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vehicle shall sign the application, including, if applicable, the declaration specifying the maximum elected gross weight as required by subsection (1)(f), and other necessary papers to enable the dealer or person to secure the title, registration plates, and transfers from the secretary of state. If the secretary of state mails or delivers a purchaser's certificate of title to a dealer, the dealer shall mail or deliver the certificate of title to the purchaser not later than 5 days after receiving the certificate of title from the secretary of state. However, as provided under section 238, the secretary of state is not required to issue a paper title to the owner of a vehicle if the title is subject to a security interest, and may issue an electronic title as provided under section 222. (6) If a vehicle is delivered to a purchaser or lessee who has valid Michigan registration plates that are to be transferred to the vehicle, and an application for title, if required, and registration for the vehicle is not made before delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser or lessee, the registration plates must be affixed to the vehicle immediately, and the dealer shall provide the purchaser or lessee with an instrument in writing, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, which serves as a temporary registration for the vehicle for a period of 30 days from the date the vehicle is delivered. (7) If the seller does not prepare the credit information, contract note, and mortgage, and the holder, finance company, credit union, or banking institution requires the installment seller to record the lien on the title, the holder, finance company, credit union, or banking institution shall pay the seller a service fee of not more than $10.00. The service fee must be paid 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 from the finance charges and must not be charged to the buyer in addition to the finance charges. The holder, finance company, credit union, or banking institution shall issue its check or bank draft for the principal amount financed, payable jointly to the buyer and seller, and the following must be imprinted on the back side of the check or bank draft: "Under Michigan law, the seller must record a first lien in favor of (name of lender) _______________ on the vehicle with vehicle identification number _______________ and title the vehicle only in the name(s) shown on the reverse side." (8) On the front of the check or draft described under subsection (7), the holder, finance company, credit union, or banking institution shall note the name or names of the prospective owners. Failure of the holder, finance company, credit union, or banking institution to comply with these requirements frees the seller from any obligation to record the lien or from any liability that may arise as a result of the failure to record the lien. A service fee must not be charged to the buyer. (9) In the absence of actual malice proved independently and not inferred from lack of probable cause, a person who in any manner causes a prosecution for larceny of a motor vehicle; for embezzlement of a motor vehicle; for any crime an element of which is the taking of a motor vehicle without authority; or for buying, receiving, possessing, leasing, or aiding in the concealment of a stolen, embezzled, or converted motor vehicle knowing that the motor vehicle has been stolen, embezzled, or converted, is not liable for damages in a civil action for causing the prosecution. This subsection does not relieve a person from proving any other element necessary to sustain the person's cause of action. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (10) Receipt by the secretary of state of a properly tendered application for a certificate of title on which a security interest in a vehicle is to be indicated is a condition of perfection of a security interest in the vehicle and is equivalent to filing a financing statement under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.9994, with respect to the vehicle. When a security interest in a vehicle is perfected, it has priority over the rights of a lien creditor as that term is defined in section 9102 of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.9102. (11) Notwithstanding subsection (4), a dealer selling, leasing, or exchanging vehicles, required to be titled, after March 31, 2021 but before August 1, 2021, may apply to the secretary of state for a new title, if required, and transfer or secure registration plates and secure a certificate of registration for the vehicle in the name of the purchaser within 30 days. Both of the following apply to a dealer that complies with this subsection: (a) The dealer's license must not be suspended or revoked in accordance with section 249 for failure to apply for a title when required or for failure to transfer or secure registration plates and certificate of registration within the 21-day period required under subsection (4). (b) The secretary of state shall not charge any applicable late fees required under subsection (4) and shall, on the dealer's request, reimburse a late fee charged and collected after March 31, 2021 to the end of the period described under this subsection. (12) Notwithstanding subsection (5), a dealer selling or exchanging an off lease or buy back vehicle after March 31, 2021 but before August 1, 2021 may apply to the secretary of state for a new title for the vehicle within not later than 30 days after the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 dealer receives the certificate of title from the lessor or manufacturer under section 235 or 235b and transfer or secure registration plates and secure a certificate of registration for the vehicle in the name of the purchaser. Both of the following apply to a dealer that complies with this subsection: (a) The dealer's license must not be suspended or revoked in accordance with section 249 for failure to apply for a title when required or for failure to transfer or secure registration plates and certificate of registration within the 21-day period required under subsection (5). (b) The secretary of state shall not charge any applicable late fees required under subsection (5) and shall, on the dealer's request, reimburse a late fee charged and collected after March 31, 2021 to the end of the period described under this subsection. Sec. 217c. (1) The secretary of state may conduct periodic reviews of the records of a dealer to determine whether adequate notice is given to a transferee or lessee of a rebuilt salvage vehicle of that vehicle's prior designation as a salvage vehicle. The secretary of state may request an insurance company to provide copies of salvage title documents and claims reports involving major component parts to assist the secretary of state in monitoring compliance with this act. (2) Except for a late model vehicle that has been stolen and recovered and that has no major component part removed, missing, or destroyed, or damaged and not salvageable, an insurance company licensed to conduct business in this state that acquires ownership of a late model vehicle through the payment of a claim shall proceed under either of the following: (a) If the insurance company acquires ownership of the vehicle 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 through payment of a total loss claim, the owner of the vehicle must shall assign the certificate of title to the insurance company, which shall do all of the following: (i) Surrender a properly assigned certificate of title to the secretary of state. (ii) If the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or more than 75% but less than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, apply for a salvage certificate of title, and if the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, apply for a scrap certificate of title. The insurance company shall not sell the vehicle without first receiving a salvage or scrap certificate of title, which shall must be assigned to the buyer. An insurance company may assign a salvage or scrap certificate of the title only to an automotive recycler, used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, foreign salvage vehicle dealer, distressed vehicle transporter, or vehicle scrap metal processor. (b) If after payment of a total loss claim the insurance company permits the owner of the vehicle to retain ownership, the insurance company shall do all of the following: (i) If the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 75% but less than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, require each owner of the vehicle to sign an application for a salvage certificate of title, or if the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, require each owner of the vehicle to sign an application for a scrap vehicle certificate of title. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (ii) Attach the owner's certificate of title to the application for a salvage or scrap certificate of title or have the owner certify that the certificate of title is lost. (iii) On behalf of the owner, apply to the secretary of state for a salvage or scrap certificate of title in the name of the owner. The owner shall not sell or otherwise dispose of the vehicle without first receiving a salvage or scrap certificate of title, which must be assigned to the buyer. An insurance company may assign a salvage or scrap certificate of title only to an automotive recycler, used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, foreign salvage vehicle dealer, or vehicle scrap metal processor. (3) If an insurance company pays a claim for total loss to the owner or lienholder of record as kept by the secretary of state, or both, if applicable, of a vehicle but the owner or lienholder of record as kept by the secretary of state fails to surrender the certificate of title or other document necessary for the transfer of ownership of the vehicle to the insurance company within the expiration of not later than 30 days after the claim payment, the insurance company, without having obtained the surrender of the title or other document otherwise necessary for the transfer of ownership for the vehicle from the owner or lienholder of record as kept by the secretary of state, or both, if applicable, may apply to the secretary of state for a title as provided under this section. The insurance company shall, at the time of application, provide proof of the payment and that the insurance company has requested in writing, by certified mail or by another commercially available delivery service providing proof of delivery, on at least 2 separate occasions that the owner or lienholder of record as kept by the secretary of state surrender to the insurance company the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 certificate of title or other document necessary for the transfer of ownership to the insurance company. The application must be signed under the penalty of perjury. Subject to subsection (2)(a)(ii), upon on meeting the requirements of this subsection, the secretary of state shall issue to the insurance company the appropriate certificate of title free of all liens. Proof of payment of the claim is satisfied only by 1 of the following: (a) In the case of payment by check, either of the following: (i) A copy of the front and back of the endorsed check. (ii) Evidence that the check has cleared the account of the payer. (b) In the case of payment by electronic transfer, evidence that the payment was charged to the account of the payer. (4) Except as provided in subsection (3), if an insurance company acquires ownership of a vehicle other than a late model vehicle through payment of damages due to an accident, the company shall surrender a properly assigned title to the buyer upon on delivery. (5) If a dealer acquires ownership of a late model vehicle that is a distressed vehicle from an owner, the dealer shall receive an assigned certificate of title. If the assigned certificate of title is not a salvage or scrap certificate of title, the dealer, other than a vehicle scrap metal processor, shall surrender the assigned certificate of title to the secretary of state, and, if the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 75% but less than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, apply for a salvage certificate of title, or if the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 91% of the predamaged 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 actual cash value of the vehicle, apply for a scrap certificate of title within 5 not later than 10 days after the dealer receives the assigned certificate of title. The dealer may sell a salvage vehicle to another an automotive recycler, used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, foreign salvage vehicle dealer, distressed vehicle transporter, or vehicle scrap metal processor by assigning the salvage certificate of title to the buyer. Unless the vehicle is rebuilt, inspected, and recertified under this section, if the vehicle is sold to a buyer other than a licensed dealer, application must be made for a salvage certificate in the name of the buyer in the manner provided in this act. The dealer may sell a scrap vehicle only to a vehicle scrap metal processor. A vehicle scrap metal processor shall surrender an assigned certificate of title to the secretary of state within not later than 30 days after acquiring a vehicle for which a certificate of title was received. A vehicle scrap metal processor shall surrender an assigned salvage or scrap certificate of title to the secretary of state within not later than 30 days after acquiring a vehicle for which a salvage or scrap certificate of title was received and processed, and report that the vehicle was destroyed or scrapped. (6) An application for a scrap certificate of title must be made on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and accompanied by a fee of $15.00. The application must contain all of the following: (a) The complete name and current address of the owner. (b) A description of the vehicle, including its make, style of body, model year, fee category or weight, color, and vehicle identification number. (c) If the vehicle is a late model vehicle, a listing of each 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 major component part that was not salvageable. (d) Further information as may reasonably be required by the secretary of state. (7) The scrap certificate of title must authorize the holder of the document to transport but not drive on a highway the vehicle or parts of a vehicle, and assign ownership to a vehicle scrap metal processor, automotive recycler, used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, or foreign salvage vehicle dealer. A certificate of title must not again be issued for this vehicle. A person shall not rebuild or repair a scrap vehicle and allow it to retain the original vehicle identification number. (8) If a person, other than a dealer or insurance company that is subject to subsection (2) or (5), acquires ownership of a distressed, late model vehicle, the person must surrender the title or assigned certificate of title to the secretary of state, and if the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 75% but less than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, apply for a salvage certificate of title, or if the estimated cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, apply for a scrap certificate of title before the vehicle may be transported. (9) An owner of a vehicle may determine that a vehicle is a scrap vehicle or a salvage vehicle without making any determination as to the actual cash value of the vehicle. (10) If a leasing company, vehicle manufacturer, insurance company not licensed to do business in this state, association, repossession company, self-insured owner, financial institution, governmental entity, or other company, institution, or entity, owns 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a distressed, late model vehicle, the titleholder shall surrender the title or assigned certificate of title to the secretary of state and apply for a salvage certificate of title if the retail cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 75% but less than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, or if the retail cost of repair, including parts and labor, is equal to or greater than 91% of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle, apply for a scrap certificate of title, before the vehicle may be transported or sold. If ownership is transferred, the owner must sell the vehicle only to a dealer that is eligible to buy a salvage or scrap vehicle in this state unless the owner complies with subsection (13). When a leasing company, vehicle manufacturer, insurance company not licensed to do business in this state, association, repossession company, self-insured owner, financial institution, governmental entity, or other company, institution, or entity, estimates the repair of a distressed, late model vehicle for the purpose of determining whether to apply for a salvage or scrap certificate of title, a complete record of the estimate and, if the vehicle is repaired before a transfer of ownership, a complete record of the actual cost of the repairs performed and who performed the repairs must be maintained for a minimum of 5 years by the leasing company, vehicle manufacturer, insurance company not licensed to do business in this state, association, repossession company, self-insured owner, financial institution, governmental entity, or other company, institution, or entity. The estimates and repair records required by this subsection must be available for unannounced inspections by a law enforcement agency or a representative of the secretary of state. The secretary of state may request a leasing company, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vehicle manufacturer, insurance company not licensed to do business in this state, association, repossession company, self-insured owner, financial institution, governmental entity, or other company, institution, or entity to provide copies of title documents, repair estimates, claims reports involving major component parts, and actual cash value determination documents to assist the secretary of state in monitoring compliance with this act. (11) An application for a salvage certificate of title must be made on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and accompanied by a fee of $10.00. The application must contain all of the following: (a) The complete name and current address of the owner. (b) A description of the vehicle, including its make, style of body, model year, fee category or weight, color, and vehicle identification number. (c) An estimate of the cost repair, including parts and labor, and an estimate of the predamaged actual cash value of the vehicle. (d) If the vehicle is a late model vehicle, a listing of each major component part that was not salvageable. (e) Further information as may reasonably be required by the secretary of state. (12) The secretary of state shall issue and mail the salvage certificate within not later than 5 business days after the time the application is received at the secretary of state's office in Lansing. Each salvage certificate of title must include a listing of each major component part that was not salvageable. (13) A salvage certificate of title authorizes the holder of the title to possess, transport, but not drive on a highway, and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 transfer ownership in, a vehicle. The secretary of state shall not issue a certificate of title or registration plates for a vehicle for which a salvage certificate of title was issued unless a specially trained officer described in subsection (15) certifies all of the following: (a) That the vehicle identification numbers and parts identification numbers are correct. (b) That the applicant has proof of ownership of repair parts used. (c) That the vehicle complies with the equipment standards of this act. (d) That any repairs performed on the vehicle were done in a workmanlike manner, as certified on a form provided by the department by a properly licensed mechanic in the appropriate specialty. A properly licensed mechanic described in under this subdivision must not be the same individual as the specially trained officer making the certification of the vehicle as required under this subsection. (14) The certification required by subsection (13) must be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the secretary of state in conjunction with the department of state police and must accompany the application that is submitted to the secretary of state for a certificate of title. An application for a certificate of title must contain a description of each salvageable part used to repair the vehicle and any identification number affixed to or inscribed on the part as required by state or federal law. Upon On satisfactory completion of the inspection as required by the secretary of state and other requirements for application, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of title for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vehicle bearing the legend "rebuilt salvage". (15) An officer specially trained as provided by the secretary of state and authorized by the secretary of state to conduct a salvage vehicle inspection is any of the following: (a) An employee of the department of state. (b) An on-duty or off-duty police officer. (c) A previously certified police officer who is appointed by the local police agency as a limited enforcement officer to conduct salvage vehicle inspections. The local police agency shall give this officer access to the agency's law enforcement information network system and the authority to confiscate any stolen vehicle or vehicle parts discovered during an inspection. The local police agency may give the officer the authority to arrest a person suspected of having unlawful possession of a stolen vehicle or vehicle parts. The local police agency shall not appoint a previously certified police officer whose certificate has been suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (16). (16) The secretary of state shall issue a certificate to an officer who is specially trained as provided by the secretary of state to conduct salvage vehicle inspections. Only a person who has a valid certification from the secretary of state may perform salvage inspections. The secretary of state on the secretary of state's own initiative or in response to complaints shall make reasonable and necessary public or private investigations within or outside of this state and gather evidence against an officer who was issued a certificate and who violated or is about to violate this act or a rule promulgated under this act. Subject to subsection (17), the secretary of state may suspend, revoke, or deny a certificate after an investigation if the secretary of state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 determines that the officer committed 1 or more of the following: (a) Violated this act or a rule promulgated under this act. (b) Was, after an investigation, found responsible for a fraudulent act in connection with the inspection, purchase, sale, lease, or transfer of a salvage vehicle. (c) Was found guilty of the theft, embezzlement, or misappropriation of salvage vehicle inspection fees. (d) Performed improper, careless, or negligent salvage vehicle inspections. (e) Ceased to function as a police officer because of suspension, retirement, dismissal, disability, or termination of employment. (f) Was convicted of a violation or attempted violation of 1986 PA 119, MCL 257.1351 to 257.1355. (g) Made a false statement of a material fact in the officer's certification of a salvage vehicle inspection or any record concerning a salvage vehicle inspection. (h) Charged a fee in excess of the fee described in subsection (26). (17) If the secretary of state revokes, suspends, or denies a certificate under subsection (16)(a), (d), (g), or (h), the secretary of state shall, at the time of revocation, suspension, or denial, notify the officer and the law enforcement agency on behalf of which the officer is performing inspections of the law enforcement agency's right to appeal the revocation, suspension, or denial. The notification must include a statement that a request for an appeal under this subsection must be made no later than 30 days after the revocation, suspension, or denial. An agency making an appeal under this subsection may request a hearing at the time 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the appeal is made. The secretary of state or any person designated by the secretary of state to act in the secretary of state's place shall deny or grant an appeal made under this subsection within a reasonable period, in writing or stated in the record if a hearing is held. If the secretary of state revokes a certificate under subsection (16)(a), (d), (g), or (h) and denies an appeal of the revocation under this subsection, the officer may apply for a new certificate no earlier than 5 years after the revocation. (18) Upon On receipt of the appropriate abstract of conviction from a court and without any investigation, the secretary of state shall immediately revoke the certificate of an officer who has been convicted of a violation or attempted violation of section 413, 414, 415, 535, 535a, or 536a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.413, 750.414, 750.415, 750.535, 750.535a, and 750.536a, or has been convicted in federal court or in another state of a violation or attempted violation of a law substantially corresponding to 1 of those sections. (19) If a dealer, other than a vehicle scrap metal processor, acquires ownership of an older model a vehicle from an owner, the dealer shall must receive an assigned certificate of title and shall retain it as long as the dealer retains the vehicle. If a vehicle scrap metal processor acquires ownership of a vehicle from an owner who is not a licensed dealer, the vehicle scrap metal processor must receive an assigned certificate of title and shall retain the certificate of title until surrendered to the secretary of state under this subsection. A vehicle scrap metal processor, used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, distressed vehicle transporter, or automotive recycler shall surrender an assigned certificate of title to the secretary of state within 30 days after 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the vehicle is destroyed or scrapped.as required under this subsection. A vehicle scrap metal processor shall surrender an assigned certificate of title not later than 30 days after processing the vehicle. If an automotive recycler, used or secondhand parts dealer, used vehicle dealer, distressed vehicle transporter, or foreign salvage vehicle dealer sells or assigns a vehicle to a vehicle scrap metal processor, the seller or assignor shall surrender the certificate of title to the secretary of state not later than 30 days after the vehicle is sold or assigned as required under subsection (20). (20) A dealer selling or assigning a vehicle to a vehicle scrap metal processor shall make a record in a format determined by the secretary of state. triplicate on a form to be provided by the secretary of state in substantially the following form: Scrap Vehicle Inventory: SELLER: Dealer name __________________________________________ Dealer address _______________________________________ Dealer license number ________________________________ PURCHASER: Conveyed to:_________________________ Date____________ (Vehicle scrap metal processor) Dealer address _______________________________________ Dealer license number ________________________________ Vehicles Dealer's Stock Model Year Vehicle Make VIN Title Number Number Color 1.________ ____________ ___ ___________ ______ ______ 2.________ ____________ ___ ___________ ______ ______ 3.________ ____________ ___ ___________ ______ ______ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 etc. One copy must be retained as a permanent record by the dealer, 1 copy must be forwarded with the vehicle to be retained by the vehicle scrap metal processor, and 1 copy must be forwarded to the secretary of state.The purchasing dealer's name noted on the record must correspond to the name of the assignee on the title submitted by the selling dealer provided under subsection (19). The record must include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The dealer's name, address, and license number. (b) The scrap metal processor's name, address, and license number. (c) The date of the transaction. (d) The vehicle's year, make, vehicle identification number, title number, dealer stock number, and color. (21) A person, other than an automotive recycler, used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, distressed vehicle transporter, or a foreign salvage vehicle dealer, receiving a salvage certificate of title shall not sell the vehicle to anyone other than 1 of the following: (a) The vehicle's former owner. (b) A used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer. (c) A vehicle scrap metal processor. (d) A foreign salvage vehicle dealer licensed under this act. (e) An automotive recycler. (f) A distressed vehicle transporter. (22) A person receiving a scrap certificate of title shall not sell the vehicle to anyone other than 1 of the following: (a) An automotive recycler. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) A vehicle scrap metal processor. (c) A foreign salvage vehicle dealer licensed under this act. (d) A used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer. (e) A distressed vehicle transporter. (23) The secretary of state may conduct periodic reviews of the records of a dealer to determine whether adequate notice is given to a transferee or lessee of a rebuilt salvage vehicle of that vehicle's prior designation as a salvage vehicle. The secretary of state may request an insurance company to provide copies of salvage title documents and claims reports involving major component parts to assist the secretary of state in monitoring compliance with this act. (24) A licensed automotive recycler, used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, vehicle scrap metal processor, vehicle salvage pool operator, distressed vehicle transporter, foreign salvage vehicle dealer, or broker that has removed a scrap vehicle from this state for the purpose of rebuilding the vehicle or selling or leasing the vehicle to a person other than a vehicle scrap metal processor, shall receive an automatic suspension of its dealer license and of any salvage vehicle agent's license assigned to that dealer for a period of 30 days. Upon On receipt by the secretary of state of a written request from the dealer, the dealer shall have the right to an immediate hearing on the matter within that 30-day period. (25) For the purpose of this section, the estimated costs of the repair parts must be determined by using the current published retail cost of original manufacturer equipment parts or an estimate of the actual cost of the repair parts. The estimated labor costs must be computed by using the hourly rate and time allocations that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 are reasonable and commonly assessed in the repair industry in the community where the repairs are performed. (26) A police agency shall charge a fee for an inspection of a vehicle under subsection (13). Each local authority with a police agency shall determine the amount of the fee for inspections by that police agency, that but the fee must not exceed $100.00. $125.00. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a fee collected under this subsection must be deposited with the local authority for that police agency. The records of the local authority regarding the collection and disposition of inspection fees is subject to review or audit by the local unit of government and must be made available upon on request to the department. If an inspection was conducted by an employee of the department of state, the fee must be deposited with the department of state. A fee collected by a local authority must be used for law enforcement purposes. related to stolen vehicles, including, but not limited to, equipment and road patrol services that increase the likelihood of recovering stolen vehicles or stolen vehicle parts, and salvage vehicle inspections. A fee collected by the department of state must be used by the department for the administration of the salvage vehicle inspection program and must not lapse to the general fund. A local police agency may compensate an off-duty and limited enforcement police officer for a salvage vehicle inspection. (27) For the purpose of this section, "actual cash value" means the retail dollar value of a vehicle as determined by an objective vehicle evaluation using local market resources such as dealers or want ads or by an independent vehicle evaluation or vehicle appraisal service or by a current issue of a nationally 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 recognized used vehicle guide for financial institution appraisal purposes in this state. Sec. 233. (1) If the owner of a registered vehicle transfers or assigns the title or interest in the vehicle, the registration plates issued for the vehicle shall must be removed and transferred to the owner's spouse, mother, father, sister, brother, or child to whom title or interest in the vehicle is transferred, or retained and preserved by the owner for transfer to another vehicle upon on application and payment of the required fees. A person shall not transfer the plates to a vehicle without applying for a proper certificate of registration describing the vehicle to which the plates are being transferred, except as provided in section 217(4). If the owner of a registered vehicle acquires another vehicle without transferring or assigning the title or interest in the vehicle for which the plates were issued, the owner may have the plates transferred to the subsequently acquired vehicle upon on application and payment of the required fees. (2) A person shall not purchase or lease another vehicle or an interest in another vehicle with the intent to circumvent the restrictions created by immobilization of a vehicle under this act. (3) A person shall not transfer or attempt to transfer ownership or right of possession of a vehicle subject to forfeiture or ordered forfeited under this act with the intent to avoid the forfeiture of that vehicle. (4) During the time a vehicle is subject to a temporary registration plate, vehicle forfeiture, immobilization, registration denial, or the period from adjudication to immobilization or forfeiture under this act, a person shall not without a court order transfer or assign the title or an interest 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 in the vehicle to a person who that is not subject to payment of a use tax under section 3 of the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.93. (5) A person who that violates subsection (2), (3), or (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (6) A person An individual whose operator's or chauffeur's license is suspended, revoked, or denied for, or who has never been licensed by this state and was convicted for, a third or subsequent violation of section 625 or 625m, of a local ordinance substantially corresponding to section 625 or 625m, or of a law of another state substantially corresponding to section 625 or 625m, or for a fourth or subsequent suspension or revocation under section 904 shall not purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire a motor vehicle during the suspension, revocation, or denial period. A person An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (7) If the assigned holder of registration plates applies for a new registration certificate, the application shall must be accompanied either by the old registration certificate or by a certificate of title showing the person to be the assigned holder of the registration plates for which the old registration certificate had been issued. A person who that fails or neglects to fulfill the requirements of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (8) The Except for a title issued electronically under section 222, the owner shall indorse endorse on the certificate of title as required by the secretary of state an assignment of the title with 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 warranty of title in the form printed on the certificate with a statement of all security interests in the vehicle or in accessories on the vehicle and deliver or cause the certificate to be mailed or delivered to the purchaser or transferee at the time of the delivery to the purchaser or transferee of the vehicle. The certificate shall must show the payment or satisfaction of any security interest as shown on the original title. However, as provided under section 238, the secretary of state is not required to issue a title to the owner of a vehicle if the title is subject to a security interest. (9) Upon On the delivery of a motor vehicle and the transfer, sale, or assignment of the title or interest in a motor vehicle by a person, including a dealer, the effective date of the transfer of title or interest in the vehicle is the date of signature on either the application for title or the assignment of the certificate of title by the purchaser, transferee, or assignee. (10) A secured receipt that is in a form approved by the department and produced at the time the secured interest is presented with payment in satisfaction of the security interest may be submitted to the department in lieu of the title for purposes of transferring ownership in the vehicle. Sec. 233a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (17), if the owner of a registered motor vehicle transfers the owner's title or interest in that vehicle, the transferor shall present to the transferee before delivery of the vehicle, written disclosure of odometer mileage by means of the certificate of title or a written statement signed by the transferor including the transferor's printed name, containing all of the following: (a) The odometer reading at the time of transfer, not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 including the tenths of a mile or kilometer. (b) The date of transfer. (c) The transferor's name and current address. (d) The transferee's name and current address. (e) The identity of the vehicle, including its make, model, body type, year, and vehicle identification number. (f) A reference to this section and comparable federal law, and a statement that failing to complete the title or form or providing false information may result in civil liability and civil or criminal penalties being imposed on the transferor. (g) One of the following: (i) A statement by the transferor certifying that to the best of the transferor's knowledge the odometer reading reflects the actual mileage of the vehicle. (ii) If the transferor knows that the odometer reading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of the designed mechanical odometer limit, a statement to that effect. (iii) If the transfer knows that the odometer reading differs from the mileage and the difference is greater than that caused by odometer calibration error, a statement that the odometer reading does not reflect the actual mileage and should not be relied on. This notice must include a warning notice to alert the transferee that a discrepancy exists between the odometer and the actual mileage. (h) Space for the signature and printed name of the transferee, and the date of presentation to the transferee. (2) A certificate of title and a dealer reassignment form must contain a place for the information required by subsection (1)(a) to (h). If the vehicle is not titled or the title does not contain 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 a space for the required information, a written statement must be provided as a separate document. (3) A dealer selling or exchanging vehicles required to be titled under this act shall present the certificate of title or written statement and any reassigned titles in the dealer's possession to the transferee. The transferee or the transferee's agent shall inspect, print the transferee's or transferee's agent's name on, sign, and date the certificate or statement and return it to the transferor for submission to the secretary of state. If neither the transferee nor transferor is a dealer licensed under this act, completing the odometer information on the certificate of title must be considered to comply with subsection (1). A person shall not sign an odometer disclosure statement as both the transferor and transferee in the same transaction. (4) A new or used vehicle dealer shall obtain from the transferor a completed odometer mileage statement that meets the requirements of subsection (1) with each motor vehicle acquired by the dealer. Except as provided in subsection (16), the dealer shall not accept or provide an odometer mileage statement or a title that contains a place for odometer information that has not been completely filled in by the transferor. (5) The odometer information described in subsection (1) must not be required for any of the following: (a) Vehicles having a gross vehicle weight rating of more than 16,000 pounds. (b) A vehicle that is not self-propelled. (c) A vehicle manufactured in or before the 2010 model year that is transferred at least 10 years after January 1 of the calendar year that is included in the model year in which the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vehicle is manufactured. (d) A vehicle manufactured in or after the 2011 model year that is transferred at least 20 years after January 1 of the calendar year that is included in the model year in which the vehicle was manufactured. (e) A new vehicle transferred from a manufacturer to a dealer. (f) A vehicle sold directly by the manufacturer to an agency of the United States in conformity with contractual specifications. (g) A low-speed vehicle. (h) A scrap vehicle. (6) A person shall not alter, set back, or disconnect an odometer; cause or allow an odometer to be altered, set back, or disconnected; or advertise for sale, sell, use, install, or cause or allow to be installed a device which causes an odometer to register other than the actual mileage driven. This subsection does not prohibit the service, repair, or replacement of an odometer if the mileage indicated on the odometer remains the same as before the service, repair, or replacement. If the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before the service, repair, or replacement, the odometer must be adjusted to read zero and a notice in writing must be attached to the left door frame of the vehicle by the owner or the owner's agent specifying the mileage prior to service, repair, or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was serviced, repaired, or replaced. A person shall not remove, deface, or alter any notice affixed to a motor vehicle under this subsection. (7) A person who violates subsection (6) is guilty of a felony. (8) Before executing a transfer of ownership document, a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 lessor of a leased vehicle shall notify the lessee in writing that ownership of the vehicle is being transferred and that the lessee is required to provide a written statement to the lessor regarding the mileage of the vehicle. This notice must inform the lessee of the penalties for failure to comply with the requirement. (9) Upon On receiving notification from the lessor of a leased vehicle that ownership of the vehicle is to be transferred, the lessee shall furnish to the lessor a written statement regarding the mileage of the vehicle. This statement must be signed by the lessee and must contain all of the following: (a) The printed name of the person making the statement. (b) The current odometer reading, not including tenths of miles. (c) The date of the statement. (d) The lessee's name and current address. (e) The lessor's name and current address. (f) The identity of the vehicle, including its make, model, year, body type, and vehicle identification number. (g) The date that the lessor notified the lessee of the requirements of this subsection. (h) The date that the completed disclosure statement was received by the lessor. (i) The signature of the lessor. (j) One of the following: (i) A statement by the lessee certifying that to the best of the lessee's knowledge the odometer reading reflects the actual mileage of the vehicle. (ii) If the lessee knows that the odometer reading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of the designed mechanical odometer 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 limit, a statement to that effect. (iii) If the lessee knows that the odometer reading differs from the mileage and that the difference is greater than that caused by odometer calibration error, a statement that the odometer reading is not the actual mileage and should not be relied on. (10) If the lessor transfers a leased vehicle without obtaining possession of the vehicle, the lessor may indicate on the certificate of title the mileage disclosed by the lessee under subsection (9), unless the lessor has reason to believe that the mileage disclosed by the lessee does not reflect the actual mileage of the vehicle. (11) A dealer that is required by this section to execute an odometer mileage statement shall retain for 5 years a photostatic, carbon, or other facsimile copy of each odometer mileage statement the dealer issues or receives. The dealer shall retain the odometer mileage statements at the dealer's primary place of business in an order that is appropriate to business requirements and that permits systematic retrieval. (12) A lessor shall retain, for 5 years following the date of transfer of ownership of each leased vehicle, the odometer mileage statement received from the lessee. The lessor shall retain the odometer mileage statements at the lessor's primary place of business in an order that is appropriate to business requirements and that permits systematic retrieval. (13) An auction dealer or vehicle salvage pool operator shall establish and retain at the auction dealer's or vehicle salvage pool operator's primary place of business in an order that is appropriate to business requirements and that permits systematic retrieval, for 5 years following the date of sale of each motor 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vehicle, the following records: (a) The name and the most recent owner, other than the auction dealer or salvage pool operator. (b) The name of the buyer. (c) The vehicle identification number. (d) The odometer reading, not including the tenths of a mile, on the date the auction dealer or salvage pool operator took possession of the motor vehicle. (14) A violation of subsection (1) or (6) by any dealer licensed under this act is prima facie evidence of a fraudulent act as provided in section 249. (15) A person who, with intent to defraud, violates any requirement under subsection (1) or (6), or a dealer that fails to retain for 5 years each odometer mileage statement the dealer receives and each odometer mileage statement furnished by the dealer upon on the sale of a vehicle, is liable in an amount equal to 3 times the amount of actual damages sustained or $1,500.00 whichever is greater, and in the case of a successful recovery of damages, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees. (16) For the purposes of this section and beginning not later than July 1, 2026, the department may shall accept an electronically signed odometer disclosure document that complies with all of the following:from a new vehicle dealer or a used or secondhand vehicle dealer approved by the department. (a) Is submitted on a form that is approved by the department. (b) Is electronically signed using software that provides antitamper and identification verification technology and is approved for this use by the department. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Is otherwise fully compliant with 49 CFR part 580. (17) The department may establish, implement, and operate an electronic system to process the notification and transfer of a vehicle ownership interest between private parties through an electronic transfer instead of the collection of paper documents otherwise required under this act. If the electronic system is established, a private party that uses the electronic system shall comply with any requirement of this section that the department determines is necessary and provide any information that is required by the department. The department may enter into 1 or more contracts to establish, implement, and operate the electronic system under this subsection. The contract must require the protection of proprietary information contained in the electronic system and other information as protected under this act. (18) As used in this section, "private parties" means that both a vehicle's buyer and seller are not a dealer. Sec. 233b. (1) As used in this section: (a) "Distributor" means that term as defined in section 3(1) of the motor vehicle franchise act, 1981 PA 118, MCL 445.1563. (b) "Manufacturer" means that term as defined in section 4(2) 4(5) of the motor vehicle franchise act, 1981 PA 118, MCL 445.1564. (c) "Program vehicle" means a motor vehicle from either the current model year or the immediately preceding model year, that was repurchased by a manufacturer or distributor from a rental car company. (2) Except as provided in this subsection, a new motor vehicle dealer shall disclose in writing to a purchaser or lessee of a new motor vehicle, demonstrator, courtesy transportation vehicle, executive or manufacturer's vehicle, or program vehicle before 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 entering into a sales contract or lease agreement that, after the vehicle completed the manufacturing process, the vehicle was damaged and repaired, including an itemization of repairs, if the dealer has knowledge of the damage and repairs and if the cost of the cumulative repairs, as calculated at the rate of the dealer's authorized warranty rate for labor and parts exceeds either 1 of the following: (a) Five percent of the manufacturer's suggested retail price of the vehicle. (b) Seven hundred fifty One thousand five hundred dollars in surface coating repairs or corrosion protection restoration or a combination of these items. If a new motor vehicle dealer fails to comply with this subsection, the purchaser or lessee shall retain all applicable remedies available under article 2 of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.2101 to 440.2725. (3) A dealer in new motor vehicles is not required to disclose to a purchaser or lessee under this act that any glass, tires, wheels, bumpers, audio equipment, in-dash components, or components contained in the living quarters of a motor home that are not required for the operation of the motor home as a motor vehicle were damaged at any time if the damaged item has been replaced with original manufacturer's parts and material. (4) Repaired damage to a motor vehicle, subject to this section, not exceeding the cost of cumulative repairs as determined pursuant to subsection (2) shall is not constitute grounds for revocation of acceptance by the purchaser or lessee. The right of revocation ceases upon the purchaser's or lessee's acceptance of delivery of the vehicle. Sec. 234. (1) The Except for a title issued electronically 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under section 222, if a purchaser or transferee, unless the person is a licensed dealer, shall present or cause presents or causes to be presented the certificate of title and registration certificate if plates are being transferred to another vehicle, assigned as provided in this act, to the secretary of state accompanied by with the fees as provided by law, whereupon a new certificate of title and registration certificate shall must be issued to the assignee. The certificate of title shall must be mailed or delivered to the owner or another person the owner may direct in a separate instrument in a form prescribed by the secretary of state. shall prescribe. (2) If the secretary of state mails or delivers a purchaser's or transferee's certificate of title to a dealer, the dealer shall mail or deliver that certificate of title to the purchaser or transferee not more than 5 days after receiving the certificate of title. from the secretary of state. (3) Unless the transfer is made and the fee fees are paid within 15 21 days, the vehicle is considered to be without registration, the secretary of state may repossess the license plates, and transfer of the vehicle ownership may be effected and a valid registration acquired thereafter only upon after payment of a transfer fee of $15.00 $50.00 in addition to the fee fees provided for in section 806. (4) If a security interest is reserved or created at the time of the transfer, the parties shall comply with the requirements of section 238. Sec. 235. (1) If the transferee of a vehicle is a new motor vehicle dealer or a used or secondhand vehicle dealer that acquires the vehicle for resale, the dealer is not required to obtain a new 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 registration of the vehicle or forward the certificate of title to the secretary of state, but shall retain and have in the dealer's immediate possession, or, upon on providing prior written notice to the department and receiving the department's approval within not later than 7 business days after the department receives the written notice, at a secondary location owned by the dealer that is located within a 15-mile radius, the assigned certificate of title with the odometer information properly completed, except for a title issued electronically under section 222, or as otherwise provided in section 235b. A dealer shall obtain a certificate of title for a vehicle that has a salvage certificate of title before the dealer may operate the vehicle under dealer's license plates. Upon transferring title or interest to another person that is not a dealer, the dealer shall complete an assignment and warranty of title upon on the certificate of title, salvage certificate of title, or dealer reassignment of title form and apply for a registration and a new title as provided in section 217(4). (2) The dealer or transferee is liable for all damages arising from the operation of the vehicle while the vehicle is in the dealer's or transferee's possession. (3) Upon Except for a title issued electronically under section 222, on transferring title or interest to another dealer, the dealer shall complete an assignment and warranty of title on the certificate of title, salvage certificate of title, or dealer reassignment of title form and deliver it to the licensed dealer receiving the transfer. (4) The secretary of state shall prescribe the dealer reassignment of title form. The form must contain the title number of the accompanying title; the name, address, and, if applicable, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 dealer license number of the transferee; the year, make, model, body type, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle; the name, address, dealer number, and signature of the transferor; an odometer mileage statement as prescribed under section 233a; and any other information the secretary of state requires. (5) This section does not prohibit a dealer from selling a buy back vehicle while the certificate of title is in the possession of a manufacturer that obtained the certificate of title under the manufacturer's buy back vehicle program. The manufacturer shall mail the certificate of title to the dealer within not later than 5 business days after the manufacturer's receipt of a signed statement from the purchaser of the vehicle acknowledging the purchaser was informed by the dealer that the manufacturer acquired title to the vehicle as the result of an arbitration proceeding, under a customer satisfaction policy adopted by the manufacturer, or under 1986 PA 87, MCL 257.1401 to 257.1410, or a similar law of another state. (6) This section does not prohibit a dealer from selling an off lease vehicle while the certificate of title is in the possession of a lessor. The lessor shall mail the certificate of title to the dealer within not later than 21 days after the lessor receives the purchase price of the vehicle and any other fees and charges due under the lease. Sec. 238. (1) When an owner named in a certificate of title creates a security interest in the vehicle described in the certificate or in any accessory on the vehicle, all of the following apply: (a) The owner shall immediately execute an application in the form prescribed by the department to name the holder of the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 security interest on the certificate of title, showing the name and address of the holder and deliver the certificate of title, application, and the required fee together with a copy of the application, to the holder of the security interest. (b) The holder of the security interest shall cause the certificate of title, application, and fee and the copy of the application to be mailed or delivered to the department. (c) The department shall indicate on the copy of the application the date and place of filing of the application. (d) Upon On receipt of the certificate of title, application, and the required fee, the department shall issue a new certificate in the form provided by section 222 setting forth the name and address of each holder of a security interest in the vehicle or in any accessory on the vehicle for which a termination statement has not been filed and the date on which the application first stating the security interest was filed, and mail the certificate to the owner. However, as provided under this section, the secretary of state is not required to issue a title to the owner of a vehicle if the title is subject to a security interest. (2) A holder of any kind of a security interest may assign, absolutely or otherwise, the holder's security interest in the vehicle or any accessory thereon on the vehicle to a person other than the owner without affecting the interest of the owner or the validity of the security interest, but any person without notice of the assignment is protected in dealing with the holder of the security interest as the holder thereof.of the security interest. (3) If a person rejects the assignment or the purchase of a motor vehicle lease agreement or installment sale contract or, at any time after accepting the assignment or purchase of a motor 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vehicle lease agreement or installment sale contract, the person subsequently reassigns or transfers the motor vehicle lease agreement or installment sale contract to the licensed dealer or installment seller after a security interest is identified on the application for title or the title for the vehicle, the person shall provide written notice to the licensed dealer or installment seller that the person does not retain a security interest or that it has returned the security interest in the vehicle to the licensed dealer or installment seller. If a written notice is accompanied by a properly completed application for title, the department of state shall accept the written notice from the person and promptly issue a new title identifying the licensed dealer or installment seller as the secured party on the title to the vehicle. (4) (3) The assignee of a security interest may have the certificate of title indorsed with the assignee named as the holder of the security interest by providing the department with a copy of the assignment instrument, but the failure of the assignee to do so shall does not affect the validity of the security interest of that assignment. (5) (4) If there is no outstanding obligation and no commitment to make advances, incur obligations, or otherwise give value secured or to be secured by a security interest in a vehicle or an accessory on the vehicle, for which the certificate of title is in possession of a secured party, the secured party may, not more than 14 days after satisfaction of the obligation, execute a termination statement in the form prescribed by the department and mail or deliver the termination statement to the owner or another person as the owner may direct. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (6) (5) If there is no outstanding obligation and no commitment to make advances, incur obligations, or otherwise give value secured or to be secured by a security interest in a vehicle or an accessory on the vehicle, for which the certificate of title is in the possession of another person, the secured party shall, within 14 days after demand but not more than 30 days after demand, execute a termination statement in the form prescribed by the department and mail or deliver the termination statement to the owner or another person as the owner may direct. (7) (6) The department may require that all transactions concerning vehicle title liens and security interests be conducted by electronic means, as determined by the department. After all liens have been terminated, or for purposes of retitling the vehicle in another state or any other purpose deemed appropriate by the department, the department may issue a paper copy of the vehicle title to the vehicle's owner. (8) (7) A vehicle sale transaction in which a security interest is entered by electronic means shall must include a document recording entry of the electronic security interest and information regarding the financial institution that holds the security interest. At the time a security interest is presented with payment in satisfaction of the security interest, a secured receipt in a form approved by the department and produced at the time the security interest is presented with payment in satisfaction of the security interest may be submitted to the department in lieu instead of the title for purposes of transferring ownership in the vehicle. (9) As used in this section, "installment buyer", "installment sale contract", and "installment seller" mean those terms as 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 defined in section 2 of the motor vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.102. Sec. 239. A Except for a title issued electronically under section 222, a person shall not fail or neglect to properly endorse indorse and deliver a certificate of title to a transferee or owner lawfully entitled to the title. A person who that violates this section is responsible for a civil infraction and shall may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $100.00. Sec. 240. (1) The owner of a motor vehicle who has made a bona fide sale by transfer of his or her the owner's title or interest and, except for a title issued electronically under section 222, who has delivered possession of the vehicle and the certificate of title to that vehicle properly endorsed to the purchaser or transferee is not liable for any damages or a violation of law that subsequently results from the use or ownership of the vehicle by another, if the owner, other than a licensed dealer, satisfies the conditions prescribed under subsection (2). (2) The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a licensed dealer, shall satisfy 1 of the following conditions: (a) Accompany the purchaser of the vehicle to a secretary of state branch office to assure that the title of the vehicle being sold is transferred. (b) Maintain a record of the sale for not less than 18 months. As used in this subdivision, "record of the sale" means either a photocopy of the reassigned title or a form or document that includes the name, address, driver license number, and signature of the person to whom the vehicle is sold and the purchase price and date of sale of the vehicle. (3) A person who that violates subsection (2) is responsible 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for a civil infraction and shall may be ordered to pay a civil fine of $15.00. (4) A person who that violates subsection (2) is presumed to be the last titled owner and to be liable for towing fees and daily storage fees for an abandoned motor vehicle. Sec. 248. (1) The secretary of state shall not grant a dealer license under this section until the secretary of state conducts an investigation of the applicant's qualifications under this act. , except that this This subsection does not apply to a license renewal. The secretary of state shall conduct the investigation within 15 days after receiving the application and prepare a report on the investigation. (2) An applicant for a new vehicle dealer or a used or secondhand vehicle dealer or broker license shall include a properly executed bond or a bond renewal certificate, approved by the secretary of state, with the license application. If a renewal certificate is used, the bond is considered renewed for each succeeding year in the same amount and with the same effect as an original bond. The bond must be in the amount of $25,000.00. The bond must indemnify or reimburse a purchaser, seller, lessee, financing agency, or governmental agency for monetary loss caused through fraud, cheating, or misrepresentation in the conduct of the vehicle business whether the fraud, cheating, or misrepresentation was made by the dealer or by an employee, agent, or salesperson of the dealer. The surety shall make indemnification indemnify or reimbursement for reimburse a monetary loss only after a judgment based on fraud, cheating, or misrepresentation is entered in a court of record against the licensee, or a final order that the licensee has engaged in fraud, cheating, or misrepresentation is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 issued by the secretary of state after an administrative hearing, or the licensee and the secretary of state enter into a stipulated agreement. The bond must also indemnify or reimburse the state for any sales tax deficiency as provided in the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.51 to 205.78, or use tax deficiency as provided in the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111, for the year in which the bond is in force. The surety shall make indemnification indemnify or reimbursement reimburse only after a final judgment is entered in a court of record against the licensee, or a final order is issued by the secretary of state after an administrative hearing, or the licensee and the secretary of state enter into a stipulated agreement. A dealer or applicant that provides proof that is satisfactory to the secretary of state that a bond similar to the bond required by this subsection is executed and in force is exempt from the bond requirements of this subsection. The aggregate liability of the surety must not exceed the sum of the bond. The surety on the bond may cancel the bond by giving notice in writing to the secretary of state of the cancellation at least 30 days before the effective date of the cancellation and is not liable for a breach of condition occurring after the effective date of the cancellation. (3) An applicant for a new vehicle dealer or a used or secondhand vehicle dealer license shall apply for not less than 2 dealer plates under section 245 and shall include with the application the proper fee for those plates under section 803. (4) As a condition precedent to the granting of a license, a dealer must file with the secretary of state an irrevocable written stipulation, authenticated by the applicant, stipulating and agreeing that legal process affecting the dealer, served on the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 secretary of state or a deputy of the secretary of state, has the same effect as if personally served on the dealer. This appointment remains in force as long as the dealer has any outstanding liability within this state. (5) A person shall not carry on or conduct the business of buying, selling, brokering, leasing, negotiating a lease, or dealing in 5 or more vehicles of a type required to be titled under this act in a 12-month period unless the person obtains a dealer license from the secretary of state authorizing the carrying on or conducting of that business. A person shall not carry on or conduct the business of buying, selling, brokering, leasing, negotiating a lease, or dealing in 5 or more distressed, late model vehicles or salvageable parts to 5 or more of those vehicles in a 12-month period unless the person obtains a used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer, an automotive recycler, or a salvage pool license from the secretary of state or is an insurance company admitted to conduct business in this state. A person shall not carry on or conduct the business of buying 5 or more vehicles in a 12-month period to process into scrap metal or store or display 5 or more vehicles in a 12-month period as an agent or escrow agent of an insurance company unless the person obtains a dealer license from the secretary of state. A vehicle scrap metal processor that does not purchase vehicles or salvageable parts from unlicensed persons is not required to obtain a dealer license. A person from another state shall not purchase, sell, or otherwise deal in distressed, late model vehicles or salvageable parts unless the person obtains a foreign salvage vehicle dealer license from the secretary of state under section 248b. A person, including a dealer, shall not purchase or acquire a distressed, late model vehicle or a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 salvageable part through a salvage pool, auction, or broker without a license as a salvage vehicle agent. The secretary of state shall investigate and seek prosecution, if necessary, of persons allegedly conducting a business without a license. (6) The application for a dealer license must be in the form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed by the applicant. In addition to any other information required by the secretary of state, the application must include all of the following: (a) The name of the applicant. (b) The location of the applicant's established place of business in this state, together with a written verification from the appropriate governing or zoning authority that the established place of business meets all applicable municipal and zoning requirements. (c) The name under which the dealer will conduct business. (d) If the business is a corporation, the state of incorporation. (e) If the business is a sole proprietorship or partnership, the name, address, and date of birth of each owner or partner; if the business is a corporation, the name, address, and date of birth of each of the principal officers. (f) The county in which the applicant will conduct business and the address of each place of business in that county. (g) If the dealer's business is the sale of new vehicles, the make or makes of those vehicles. Each A new vehicle dealer shall send with the application for license a certification that the dealer holds a bona fide contract to act as factory representative, factory distributor, or distributor representative to sell at retail ......... (the make of vehicle to be sold) and that the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 contract meets the requirements for a dealer agreement under the motor vehicle franchise act, 1981 PA 118, MCL 445.1561 to 445.1583. (h) A statement of the previous history, record, and associations of the applicant and of each owner, partner, officer, or director of the applicant. The statement must be sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the secretary of state the business reputation and character of the applicant. (i) A statement showing whether the applicant has previously applied for a license, the result of the application, and whether the applicant has ever been the holder of a dealer license that was revoked or suspended. (j) If the applicant is a corporation or partnership, a statement showing whether a partner, employee, officer, or director has been refused a license or has been the holder of a license that was revoked or suspended. (k) If the application is for a used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer or an automotive recycler, all of the following: (i) Evidence that the applicant maintains or will maintain an established place of business. (ii) Evidence that the applicant maintains or will maintain a police book and vehicle parts purchase and sales and lease records as required under this act. (iii) Evidence of worker's compensation insurance coverage for employees classified under the North American Industry Classification System number 42114, 423140, entitled "motor vehicle parts (used) merchant wholesalers" or under the National Council on Compensation Insurance classification code number 3821, entitled "automobile dismantling", if applicable. (l) A certification that neither the applicant nor another 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 person named on the application is acting as the alter ego of any other person or persons in seeking the license. For the purpose of this subdivision, "alter ego" means a person that acts for and on behalf of, or in the place of, another person for purposes of obtaining a vehicle dealer license. (m) A certification that the applicant if the applicant is an individual or sole proprietorship, the partners of the applicant if the applicant is a partnership, the principal officers of the applicant if the applicant is a corporation, or any other individual who is responsible for the daily operations of the dealership, as applicable, has reviewed and understands the requirements of this act, the rules promulgated under this act, the dealer manual published by the secretary of state, and any other applicable material provided by the department. (n) For an application submitted by or on behalf of an eligible used vehicle dealer for an original license, a certification that within the 6-month period preceding the date of the application, the applicant, the partners of the applicant, or the principal officers of the applicant, as applicable, completed the dealer training program described in section 248l(2). This subdivision does not apply to an application to renew the license of an eligible used vehicle dealer and does not apply to any original license that was granted to an eligible used vehicle dealer before, and that is valid on, March 20, 2019. As used in this subdivision and subdivision (o), "eligible used vehicle dealer" means that term as defined in section 248l. (o) For an application submitted by or on behalf of an eligible used vehicle dealer for an original or renewal license, a certification that each retail sales location of that dealer has an 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 employee that has completed the dealer training program required under section 248l(3) or (5), as applicable. (7) A person shall apply separately for a dealer license for each county in which business is to be conducted. Before moving 1 or more places of business or opening an additional place of business, a dealer shall apply to the secretary of state for and obtain a supplemental dealer license. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for a supplemental dealer license and shall issue a supplemental dealer license only for a location, including a tent, temporary stand, or any temporary quarters, that does not meet the definition of an established place of business, within the county in which the dealer's established place of business is located. A dealer license entitles the dealer to conduct the business of buying, selling, leasing, and dealing in vehicles or salvageable parts in the county covered by the license. The dealer license also entitles the dealer to conduct at any other licensed dealer's established place of business in this state only the business of buying, selling, leasing, or dealing in vehicles at wholesale. (8) The secretary of state shall classify and differentiate vehicle dealers according to the type of activity they perform. A dealer shall not engage in activities of a particular classification as provided in this act unless the dealer is licensed in that classification. An applicant may apply for a dealer license in 1 or more of the following classifications: (a) New vehicle dealer. (b) Used or secondhand vehicle dealer. A used or secondhand vehicle dealer may be eligible for a mobility dealer endorsement under section 248k. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Used or secondhand vehicle parts dealer. (d) Vehicle scrap metal processor. (e) Vehicle salvage pool operator. (f) Distressed vehicle transporter. (g) Broker. (h) Foreign salvage vehicle dealer. (i) Automotive recycler. (j) Wholesaler. (9) All of the following apply to the issuance, renewal, and expiration of a dealer license under this section: (a) A dealer license expires on December 31 of the last year that the license is valid. (b) A dealer shall renew its dealer license annually. The secretary of state may renew a dealer license for a period of not more than 4 years if the secretary receives a renewal application and payment of the fee required under section 807. (c) To renew a dealer license, the dealer shall file an application for renewal with the secretary of state at least 30 days before the expiration of its current license. (d) If a dealer has not renewed its dealer license on or before the expiration date of its current license, the secretary of state within not later than 10 business days after that expiration date must notify the dealer that the secretary of state has not received its renewal application. The notice must include the amount of the late renewal fee. (e) A dealer may continue to operate its dealer business after the expiration of its dealer license, pending approval of the renewal application, if the renewal application is delivered in person or mailed to the secretary of state on or before the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 expiration date of the license. If requested by the department, a dealer that mails an application under this subdivision must provide proof of the mailing of the renewal application that is satisfactory to the department. (f) If an application to renew a dealer license is filed with the secretary of state after the expiration of that license, the dealer may operate its dealer business beginning on the date on which the application is delivered or mailed to the secretary of state, pending approval of the renewal application. If requested by the department, a dealer that mails an application under this subdivision must provide proof of the mailing of the renewal application that is satisfactory to the department. A dealer shall pay a renewal fee equal to 150% of the normal renewal fee for a renewal described in this subdivision. (g) If a dealer files an application to renew a dealer license more than 30 days after the expiration of that license, the dealer is considered a new applicant for a dealer license under this section. (h) The secretary of state shall deposit the late renewal fees collected under subdivisions (d) and (f) in the transportation administration collection fund created in section 810b. (i) The secretary of state shall not renew a the dealer's license if the applicant has not bought or sold more than 5 vehicles during the 12 months preceding the dealer's renewal application. (10) A dealer may conduct the business of buying, selling, or dealing in motor homes, trailer coaches, trailers, or pickup campers at a recreational vehicle show conducted at a location in this state without obtaining a separate or supplemental license 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 under subsection (7) if all of the following apply: (a) The dealer is licensed as a new vehicle dealer or used or secondhand vehicle dealer. (b) The duration of the recreational vehicle show is not more than 14 days. (c) Not less than 14 days before the beginning date of the recreational vehicle show, the show producer notifies the secretary of state, in a manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state, that the recreational vehicle show is scheduled, the location, dates, and times of the recreational vehicle show, and the name, address, and dealer license number of each dealer participating in the recreational vehicle show. (11) Notwithstanding section 235, a dealer may advertise or display to the public a vehicle that the dealer has acquired or that is available to the dealer directly from the manufacturer or distributor or the manufacturer's or distributor's subsidiary or affiliate within a reasonable period of time, or a vehicle for which the dealer has requested a paper title from the department after the dealer assumed the lien, even though the dealer is still waiting on possession of the vehicle's title. Such a The vehicle, if displayed on the dealer's lot, must be placed in a dedicated area at the dealership and arranged in a manner that clearly separates the vehicle from those vehicles that are available for immediate sale to the public with signage placed on the vehicle indicating the vehicle is not available for final sale until the title is in the possession of the dealer. (12) A dealer may park, store, hold, and repair vehicles owned under 1 dealer license on the lot or property held by the same dealer under a separate dealer license that is located within a 15- 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 mile radius. (13) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a dealer may surrender a dealer license by delivering to the secretary of state the license and written notice that the dealer surrenders the license. The surrender of a license under this subsection does not affect the dealer's administrative, civil, or criminal liability for an act committed before the surrender of the license under this subsection. The surrender of a license does not affect a proceeding to suspend or revoke a license. The secretary of state shall not issue a refund to the dealer surrendering the license. The secretary of state shall not issue the surrendering dealer a new dealer license at this location before 1 year after the voluntary surrender of the license. The secretary of state shall deny a dealer's attempt to surrender a dealer license under this subsection if the secretary of state determines that the dealer is surrendering the license to avoid disciplinary action. Sec. 248a. (1) A motor vehicle dealer shall not advertise or represent a motor vehicle to be a demonstrator, courtesy transportation vehicle, executive or manufacturer's vehicle, leased vehicle, new motor vehicle, or used or secondhand vehicle unless the vehicle so described is as defined in this act. (2) A motor vehicle dealer shall maintain and adhere to designated business hours that are filed with the secretary of state. Sec. 248j. (1) In addition to any other remedies provided by law, if the secretary of state determines that a person has acted as a dealer without a dealer license, he or she the secretary of state may issue the person a verbal or written warning or assess an administrative fine of not more than $5,000.00 for a first 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 violation, and not more than $7,500.00 for each subsequent violation occurring within not later than 7 years of after a prior violation. (2) If the secretary of state assesses an administrative fine under subsection (1), the secretary of state shall provide notice of the assessment in writing pursuant to under section 212. At a minimum, the notice of assessment shall must contain all of the following: (a) A unique identification number. (b) A description of the alleged violation that is the basis for the assessment, including the date the alleged violation occurred and a reference to the specific section or rule alleged to have been violated. (c) The administrative fine established for the violation. (d) A statement indicating that if the fine is not paid, the secretary of state may refer the fine to the department of treasury for collection. (e) A statement indicating that if the alleged violation is contested, the person has a right to request an informal conference before an administrative hearing, accompanied by simple instructions informing the person how to request or waive the informal conference. (3) Not later than 20 days after receiving the written notice of assessment, the alleged violator shall do 1 of the following: (a) Pay the administrative fine to the secretary of state. A payment waives the person's right to an informal conference and an administrative hearing. (b) Request the secretary of state to conduct an informal conference. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) Waive the right to an informal conference and request the secretary of state to conduct an administrative hearing. (d) If the person is not a licensed dealer, pay the administrative fine to the secretary of state and submit a properly completed dealer license application to the secretary of state. (4) A person's request for an informal conference or an administrative hearing shall must comply with all of the following: (a) Be in writing. (b) Be postmarked or received by the department within not later than 20 days after the date the person received the written notice of assessment. (c) State the name, address, and telephone number of the person requesting the informal conference or administrative hearing. (d) State the written notice of assessment's unique identification number. (e) State the reason for the request. (f) If the request is for an administrative hearing without an informal conference, state the person is waiving his or her the person's right to an informal conference. (5) If the secretary of state receives a request for an informal conference or an administrative hearing that meets all of the conditions prescribed in subsection (4), the secretary of state shall schedule an informal conference or an administrative hearing, as applicable. If the request fails to meet all of the conditions prescribed in subsection (4), the secretary of state may in writing deny the request. A denial shall must be served on the person by first-class mail and shall do both of the following: (a) State the reason for the denial. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Grant the person 14 days to submit a valid request to the secretary of state. (6) The secretary of state shall conduct an informal conference under this section within not later than 45 days after receiving a valid request for the conference. The secretary of state shall serve upon on the alleged violator, by first-class mail not less than 5 days before the conference, a written notice that includes time, place, and date of the informal conference. The notice shall must state that the alleged violator may be represented by an attorney at the informal conference. (7) After the informal conference, the secretary of state shall evaluate the validity of the assessment of the administrative fine and affirm , modify, or dismiss the assessment, or offer the alleged violator an alternative penalty agreement in lieu of an administrative hearing. In making the evaluation, the secretary of state may consider 1 or more of the following: (a) Whether there is reason to believe the alleged violation did in fact occur. (b) The severity of the alleged violation and its impact on the public. (c) The number of prior or related violations by the person. (d) The likelihood of future compliance by the person. (e) Any other considerations the secretary of state considers appropriate. (8) Within Not later than 20 days after conducting the informal conference, the secretary of state shall serve upon on the person by first-class mail a written statement describing whether the assessment of the administrative fine is affirmed , modified, or dismissed and the basis of the action. If the assessment is 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 affirmed, or modified, this statement shall must also advise the person that he or she the person will receive a notice of hearing where the validity of the assessment may be contested or he or she the person may immediately pay the fine to the secretary of state and that payment of the fine will prevent scheduling of an administrative hearing. (9) As an alternative to or in addition to administrative action under this section, the secretary of state may, by written agreement with the alleged violator, place the alleged violator's license on probation and include conditions on the probation in the agreement, including, but not limited to, paying an administrative fine. (10) (9) A notice of hearing under this section shall must be served on the person by first-class mail not less than 5 days before the date scheduled for the administrative hearing and, at a minimum, advise the person of all of the following: (a) The time, place, and date of hearing. (b) That an impartial hearing officer will conduct the hearing and allow the person an opportunity to examine the secretary of state's evidence and present evidence in person or in writing. (c) That the person has a right to be represented by an attorney at the administrative hearing. (d) The common reasons why the secretary of state could dismiss an assessment of an administrative fine. (e) That the hearing officer conducting the administrative hearing will be authorized to do all of the following: (i) Affirm, modify, or dismiss the assessment of an administrative fine. (ii) Correct any errors in the department's records that relate 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 directly to the assessment. (iii) Refer or not refer the fine to the department of treasury for collection. (iv) Take or order any other action or resolution considered appropriate by the hearing officer. (f) That if the department of treasury takes enforcement action against the person, he or she the person may seek a review in the court of claims. (11) (10) The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative hearing under this section pursuant to under the contested case provisions of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. If an administrative fine assessed under this section is affirmed by the decision of the hearing officer, the hearing officer may assess the person costs of not more than $500.00, to reimburse the secretary of state for proving the validity of the alleged violation, in addition to any other penalties, sanctions, or costs imposed as provided by law. (12) (11) An administrative fine assessed under this section becomes final upon on the first to occur of the following: (a) The secretary of state does not receive a valid request for an informal conference or an administrative hearing within the time period described in subsection (4). (b) Twenty days after a person waives his or her the person's right to an administrative hearing. (c) The person and the secretary of state sign an agreement that includes an administrative fine. (d) (c) An administrative hearing decision is served upon on the person. (13) (12) After a person pays the secretary of state the fine 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 imposed, the secretary of state shall forward the money to the department of treasury for deposit in a separate fund within the general fund. Upon On appropriation, this money shall must be used first to defray the expense of the secretary of state in administering this chapter. (14) (13) If an administrative fine assessed under this section is not paid within not later than 60 days after it becomes final, the secretary of state may refer the matter to the department of treasury for collection as a state debt through the offset of state tax refunds and may use the services of the department of treasury to levy the salary, wages, or other income or assets of the person as provided by law. (15) (14) Payment of an administrative fine assessed under this section does not constitute an admission of responsibility or guilt by the person. Payment of an administrative fine assessed under this section does not prevent the secretary of state from charging a violation described in the assessment of the administrative fine in a subsequent or concurrent contested case proceeding conducted by the secretary of state pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (16) (15) If the person submits a properly completed application and appropriate fee for a dealer license within not later than 20 days after an administrative fine under subsection (1) is assessed, and if the secretary of state issues the person a dealer license within not later than 45 days of after receiving the properly completed application and fee, the secretary of state shall reduce the amount of the administrative fine by 50%. (17) (16) The secretary of state shall serve a notice, denial, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 decision, or statement under this section in compliance with section 212. (18) (17) An informal conference under this section is not a compliance conference under section 92 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.292. Sec. 249. The secretary of state may deny the application of a person for a license as a dealer and refuse to issue the person a license as a dealer, or may suspend or revoke a license already issued, if the secretary of state finds that 1 or more of the following apply: (a) The applicant or licensee has made a false statement of a material fact in his or her the applicant or licensee's application. (b) The applicant or licensee has not complied with the provisions of this chapter or a rule promulgated under this chapter. (c) The applicant or licensee has sold or leased or offered for sale or lease a new vehicle of a type required to be registered under this act without having authority of a contract with a manufacturer or distributor of the new vehicle. (d) The applicant or licensee has been guilty of committed a fraudulent act in connection with selling, leasing, or otherwise dealing in vehicles of a type required to be registered under this act. As used in this subdivision, "fraudulent act" means a deliberate misrepresentation of a material fact made with the intent to deceive another person or the secretary of state that leads the other person or secretary of state to rely on the misrepresentation to the person's or secretary of state's detriment. To establish a fraudulent act under this subdivision, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the secretary of state must establish all of the following: (i) The applicant or licensee made a material representation. (ii) The representation was false. (iii) The applicant or licensee knew the representation was false or made the representation recklessly without any knowledge of the potential truth. (iv) The applicant or licensee made the representation with the intent that a person or the secretary of state act on the representation. (v) The person or secretary of state acted in reliance on the representation. (vi) The person or secretary of state suffered an injury as a result of acting in reliance on the representation. (e) The applicant or licensee has entered into or is about to enter into a contract or agreement with a manufacturer or distributor of vehicles of a type required to be registered under this act that is contrary to any provision of this act. (f) The applicant or licensee has no established place of business that is used or will be used for the purpose of selling, leasing, displaying, or offering for sale or lease or dealing in vehicles of a type required to be registered, and does not have proper servicing facilities. (g) The applicant or licensee is a corporation, or partnership, or limited liability company, and a stockholder, officer, director, or partner of the applicant or licensee has been guilty of any act or omission that would be cause for refusing, revoking, or suspending a license issued to the stockholder, officer, director, or partner as an individual. (h) The applicant or licensee has possessed a vehicle or a 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vehicle part that has been confiscated under section 415 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.415. The secretary of state shall conduct a hearing pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, before the secretary of state takes any action under this subdivision. (i) The applicant or licensee has been convicted under section 415 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.415. (j) The applicant or licensee has been convicted of violating 1986 PA 119, MCL 257.1351 to 257.1355. (k) The established place of business of the applicant or licensee is not in compliance with all applicable zoning requirements and municipal requirements. (l) The applicant or licensee has engaged in the business of buying, selling, trading, or exchanging new, used, or secondhand motor vehicles or has offered to buy, sell, trade, or exchange, or participate in the negotiation thereof, or attempted to buy, sell, trade, or exchange any motor vehicle or interest in any motor vehicle or any written instrument pertaining to a motor vehicle on a Sunday, as prohibited by 1953 PA 66, MCL 435.251 to 435.254. Sec. 250. (1) If the secretary of state receives a complaint against a licensee that merits an investigation, the secretary of state must notify the licensee, and the complaint must be made available to the licensee at no charge at the time the state notifies the licensee. Before denying, revoking, suspending, or refusing to renew a dealer's license the secretary of state shall do all of the following: (a) Investigate the licensee after a complaint in writing of any person has been filed with the secretary of state. (b) Provide the licensee with a copy of all documentation, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 including digital records and digital or audio recordings, the secretary of state collected, examined, or copied as part of the complaint at least 10 days before the hearing under subdivision (c). (c) (b) Set a date for hearing and give the licensee notice of the hearing at least not less than 10 days in advance in the manner herein provided in this section. A matter shall not proceed to hearing until all documents in subdivision (b) have been provided to the licensee. (d) (c) Record the hearing proceedings. (e) (d) Enter a final order with the secretary of state's findings. (2) A final order of the secretary of state under subsection (1)(d) (1)(e) is final unless, within not later than 30 days after notice of such the final order is mailed by the secretary of state to the person whose application or license is denied, revoked, suspended, or refused, the licensee appeals the final order to the circuit court for the county in which the licensee resides or maintains a place of business or to the circuit court for the county of Ingham. On appeal, the court shall review both law and facts as disclosed by the record, and may in its the court's discretion receive newly discovered evidence, but shall not conduct a hearing de novo. The court may confirm, modify, or set aside such a final order and make such any further orders as justice may require.requires. Sec. 258. (1) The secretary of state may cancel, revoke, delete, or suspend the registration of a vehicle, a certificate of title, registration certificate, or registration plate if any of the following apply: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) The secretary of state determines that the registration, certificate of title, or plate was fraudulently or erroneously issued. (b) The secretary of state determines that the licensee has made or is making an unlawful use of his or her the registration certificate, plate, or certificate of title. (c) A registered vehicle has been dismantled or wrecked. (d) The secretary of state determines that the required fee has not been paid and it is not paid upon on reasonable notice or demand. (e) A registration certificate or registration plate is knowingly displayed upon on a vehicle other than the one for which it was issued. (f) The secretary of state determines that the owner has committed an offense under this act involving the registration or certificate of title. (g) The secretary of state is authorized to do so under this act. (h) Upon On receiving notification from another state or foreign country that a certificate of title issued by the secretary of state has been surrendered by the owner in conformity with under the laws of that state or foreign country. (i) It is shown by satisfactory evidence that delivery of a motor vehicle in the possession of a dealer was not made to the applicant registered under this act. The money paid for registration and license fees may be refunded to the party who that applies for the refund. (j) The owner is a motor carrier subject to an out-of-service order. As used in this subdivision, "out-of-service order" means 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that term as defined in 49 CFR 390.5, and also includes an out-of-service order issued under 49 CFR 386.73. A law enforcement officer may also confiscate a registration plate issued to a motor carrier described in this subdivision. (2) If the licensee's offense consists of hauling on the registered vehicle a gross weight more than 1,000 pounds in excess of the elected gross weight specified on the owners' registration certificate, the secretary of state shall cancel the registration shall be canceled and the vehicle shall must not again be operated on the highways, roads, or streets until it is registered again and new plates are issued. The new registration fee shall must be computed on the basis of twice the difference between the original registration fee and the registration fee applicable to the gross weight constituting the violation of the elected gross weight. One-half of the new registration fee shall be is a penalty. The period of the new registration fee shall must not extend beyond the termination date of the canceled registration certificate. The new registration fee shall must not exceed the maximum gross weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles as determined by the number of axles and the legal weight applicable to those axles as specified by section 722. The gross weight of a vehicle or combination of vehicles may be determined by weighing the individual axles or group of axles, and the total weight on all axles is the gross vehicle weight. (3) Before the secretary of state makes a cancellation under subsection (1)(a), (b), (1)(b), (e), (f), or (g), the person affected by the cancellation shall must be given notice and an opportunity to be heard. Sec. 801b. (1) If a person, through error either on his or her 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the person's own part or that of the secretary of state, pays the specific tax required by section 801 or 802 more than once on the same equipment, the secretary of state, upon on application and satisfactory proof, shall refund the amount paid in error. A claim shall must be filed within not later than 1 year after the date of payment and verified by the secretary of state before a refund is made. If an application for a dealer license provided for in section 248 is withdrawn by the applicant or the applicant's heir, before issuance of the dealer license, the fees that accompanied the application under sections 803, 803a, and 807 may be refunded by the secretary of state upon on application and satisfactory proof. (2) If a person's license to drive a motor vehicle is revoked, suspended, or denied for medical or physical reasons, the person may return the registration plates and obtain a refund on the plates prorated on a monthly basis for the time period remaining in the registration year from the date the plates are returned. However, the refund shall must not exceed the original registration fee. (3) Upon On the death of a spouse, the surviving spouse may return registration plates and obtain a refund on the plates prorated on a monthly basis for the time period remaining in the registration year from the date the plates are returned. However, the refund shall must not exceed the original registration fee. (4) The owner of a registered vehicle who transfers or assigns title or interest in that registered vehicle before placing upon on the registered vehicle the registration plates or tabs issued for that registered vehicle may obtain a refund in full from the secretary of state for the registration plates or tabs. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Registration plates , or tabs issued for 1978 and thereafter shall must be returned by the owner within not later than 30 days following the date of transfer or assignment. (5) The owner of a vehicle registered pursuant to section 801d(2) who transfers or assigns title or interest in the vehicle may obtain a refund on the registration for each unused, whole registration period remaining on the registration from the date the plates are returned and the application for a refund is made. (5) (6) In the case of an original application for registration plates issued under section 217a or 803b, the secretary of state shall issue a refund prorated on a monthly basis from the date of application for the time period remaining in the previously issued registration, if an application for the refund is made and satisfactory proof is presented to the secretary of state. A refund shall must not be made if the amount due is less than $5.00. (6) (7) In the case of an original application for the registration plates bearing the letters "SEN" or "REP", the secretary of state shall issue a refund prorated on a monthly basis from the date of application for the time period remaining in the previously issued registration. (7) (8) In the case of an original application and issuance of an international registration plan registration plate under section 801g, the secretary of state shall make a refund as a credit prorated on a monthly basis from the date of application for the months remaining for the previously issued registration on the same vehicle, if an application for the refund as a credit is made and satisfactory proof of eligibility is presented to the secretary of state. A refund as a credit shall must not exceed the total amount 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the Michigan apportioned fees assessed for the plates issued under section 801g nor be made if the amount due is less than $5.00. For the purpose of this subsection, a month shall mean means 30 consecutive days and a partial month shall be is considered as a whole month. (8) If a licensed dealer submitted a vehicle title and registration application and paid a title application fee and vehicle registration fee and the registrant of the vehicle committed fraud during the registration process, the department shall issue a refund for the vehicle registration fee to the licensed dealer. Sec. 806. (1) Until October 1, 2027, an applicant for a certificate of title required by this act or an applicant for a duplicate of a certificate of title shall accompany the application with a fee of $10.00. An applicant that requests that the application be given special expeditious treatment shall accompany the application with an additional fee of $5.00. The secretary of state shall collect a $3.00 service fee, in addition to the other fees collected under this subsection, for each title issued and shall deposit the fee in the transportation administration collection fund created under section 810b through October 1, 2027. Until October 1, 2027, the $5.00 expeditious treatment fee must be deposited into the transportation administration collection fund created under section 810b. (2) An applicant for a special identifying number under section 230 shall accompany the application with a fee of $10.00. (3) In addition to paying the fees required by subsection (1), until December 31, 2027, each person that applies for a certificate of title, a salvage vehicle certificate of title, or a scrap 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 certificate of title under this act shall pay a tire disposal surcharge of $1.50 for each certificate of title or duplicate of a certificate of title that person receives. The secretary of state shall deposit money received under this subsection into the scrap tire regulatory fund created in section 16908 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.16908. (4) Beginning October 1, 2026, the fees under this section and section 810a do not apply to a new or used vehicle dealer that acquires ownership of a vehicle that has a title from this state issued electronically by the secretary of state and that was not owned by a dealer. (5) Beginning October 1, 2026, for an electronic transfer of title, if an applicant is a new or used vehicle dealer that acquires ownership of a vehicle from another new or used vehicle dealer, the applicant shall pay a fee of $5.00. This fee applies only if the selling dealer held an electronic title from this state. A new or used vehicle dealer that pays the fee under this subsection is not subject to the fees in subsections (1) to (3) or section 810a. The fee under this subsection must be deposited into the transportation administration collection fund created under section 810b. Sec. 810a. The Except as otherwise provided in section 806, the secretary of state shall collect an assessment of 50 cents in connection with the issuance of a salvage vehicle certificate of title, a certificate of title, or beginning July 1, 1994 a scrap certificate of title. The assessment shall must be collected in the same manner and at the same time as fees collected by the secretary of state pursuant to under sections 217c and 806. Each assessment 1 2 3 4 collected shall must be deposited in a vehicle theft prevention account to be expended for purposes of developing a vehicle theft prevention program, including the administration, inspection, and enforcement of antitheft procedures, as described in this act.